Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2120SV (2) 91 ll/js S.F. 496 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. A county shall not adopt or enforce 3 an ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment imposing a 4 fee in excess of forty dollars annually in order to obtain a 5 pet license. A county shall allocate all revenues from pet 6 license fees to animal control and animal welfare services. 7 A county shall not require a veterinarian to disclose pet 8 records including vaccination status as part of implementing, 9 maintaining, or enforcing a pet licensing program, but may 10 require the pet owner applying for the license to provide proof 11 of vaccination. 12 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall not adopt or enforce 15 an ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment imposing a 16 fee in excess of forty dollars annually in order to obtain 17 a pet license. A city shall allocate all revenues from pet 18 license fees to animal control and animal welfare services. 19 A city shall not require a veterinarian to disclose pet 20 records including vaccination status as part of implementing, 21 maintaining, or enforcing a pet licensing program, but may 22 require the pet owner applying for the license to provide proof 23 of vaccination. 24